Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the increased cost of catastrophic wildfires poses an immediate and growing threat to communities, infrastructure, and property in all regions of Washington state. Changing climate conditions and development patterns in the wildland urban interface increases both the likelihood and severity of wildfires capable of consuming entire communities in a single event.(2) The legislature further finds that the state must enact policies that both mitigate wildfire risk and prepare Washington to respond effectively when catastrophic wildfires occur. The scale and speed of modern wildfire events require proactive planning, financial readiness, and coordinated oversight to protect lives, property, andÂ essentialÂ public systems.(3) The legislature recognizes that a wildfire prevention and protection fundÂ can support bothÂ objectives. Such a fund can provide justice for wildfire victims by creating a reliable andÂ timelyÂ pathway to compensation when catastrophic losses occur. The legislature finds that victims of catastrophic wildfires are diverse and include tribal governments, local governments, timberland owners, homeowners, renters, and small businesses; many of whom lose not only property but housing, livelihoods, and communityÂ stability. All stand toÂ benefitÂ from the existence of a predictable, well-structured fund.(4) The legislature further finds that the fund should also support wildfire mitigation, prevention, and resilience efforts. Investment revenue generated by the fund may be used to restore forest health, reduce hazardous fuels, and help vulnerable communities harden through measures such as forest health practices and vegetation management, defensible space, and removal of burnable material around homes and critical infrastructure. These investments reduce future wildfire risk and lessen the severity of catastrophic events.(5) The legislature acknowledges that electric utilities are not the sole cause of wildfires, but utility-related ignitions can result in some of the most destructive and costly wildfire events. TheÂ magnitudeÂ of potential liability from such events threatens utility solvency, destabilizes insurance markets, increases costs for consumers, and jeopardizes the reliability of essential energy infrastructure. The legislature therefore intends that the fund also supports utility financial stability, protects ratepayers from extreme cost shocks, and helps maintainÂ affordable andÂ reliableÂ service for Washington consumers.(6) The legislature further finds that Washington cannot rely solely on the federal government to respond to catastrophic wildfires that destroy entire communities. FederalÂ assistanceÂ may be delayed or insufficient to address the full scope of losses experienced by victims and local governments. The state mustÂ establishÂ its own capacity toÂ respondÂ decisively to catastrophic events.(7) The legislature therefore intends toÂ establishÂ a wildfire prevention and protection fund as part of a comprehensive wildfireÂ resilienceÂ strategy that:(a) ProvidesÂ timelyÂ andÂ equitableÂ compensation to victims of catastrophic wildfires;(b) Supports mitigation, prevention, and infrastructure hardening to reduce future wildfire risk;(c) Preserves the financial stability of essential utilities and protects consumers from excessive rate and insurance impacts; and(d) Creates a flexible framework capable of evolving as wildfire risk, climate conditions, and best practicesÂ changeÂ over time.(8) The legislature further intends toÂ establishÂ a wildfire protection and prevention council to oversee the fund, guide investment and mitigation priorities, and take other necessary actions to protect the state from wildfire risk. The council shall promote accountability, transparency, and coordination across agencies, utilities, local governments, tribes, and affectedÂ communities.Â ByÂ establishingÂ this framework, the legislature takes a measured and forward-looking step to address the reality of catastrophic wildfire risk while advancing justice for victims, strengthening prevention and mitigation efforts, protecting consumers, and safeguarding Washington's long-term economic and environmentalÂ health.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administrator" means the fund administrator selected by the commission.(2) "Consumer-owned utility" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.29A.010.(3) "Council" means the Washington wildfire prevention and protection council.(4) "Covered wildfire" means any wildfire that is caused by an electric utility's negligence.(5) "Department" means the department of natural resources, or its authorized representatives, as defined in chapter 43.30 RCW.(6) "Electric utility" means an electrical company or a consumer-owned utility.(7) "Electrical company" has the same meaning as in RCW 80.04.010.(8) "Fund" means the wildfire prevention and protection fund.(9) "Fund contribution" means a one-time payment to be made by each electrical company to the fund.(10) "High risk customer" means an electric utility customer in a service territory that has been designated by the department under RCW 43.30.580 or by the United States forest service as having a high wildfire hazard potential.(11) "Participating electric utility" means an electric utility that has satisfied the eligibility requirements of the fund.(12) "Wildfire fund annual contribution" means the annual contribution that participating electric utilities must pay to the administrator for deposit in the fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The Washington wildfire prevention and protection council is established to implement and administer the fund. The council's primary responsibilities consist of:(a) Oversight and guidance of the fund;(b) Selecting and directing an administrator for the fund to oversee operations;(c) Setting and collecting a fund contribution that would establish a balance sufficient to implement and administer the fund through the first full fiscal year of operation;(d) Setting and collecting the wildfire surcharge for participating electric utilities under section 4(3) of this act;(e) Providing recommendations to the legislature on the structure of the fund and any potential improvements, as appropriate.(2) The council shall consist of 15 members and be comprised of the following members:(a) One representative from each of the following:(i) The department, appointed by the commissioner of public lands;(ii) The utilities and transportation commission, appointed by the chair of the utilities and transportation commission;(iii) The office of the insurance commissioner, appointed by the insurance commissioner;(iv) The office of the state treasurer, appointed by the state treasurer;(v) The office of the governor, appointed by the governor;(vi) Tribal governments, appointed by the board of natural resources;(vii) The energy resilience and emergency management office of the department of commerce, appointed by the director of the department of commerce;(viii) Investor-owned utilities, appointed by the board of natural resources;(ix) Rural electric cooperatives, appointed by the board of natural resources;(x) Public utility districts, appointed by the board of natural resources; and(xi) The public, appointed by the board of natural resources;(b) Two members from the senate, with one member appointed from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate by the president of the senate; and(c) Two members from the house of representatives, with one member appointed from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives by the speaker of the house.(3) The members of the council shall select a chair and vice chair from the members representing a state agency or tribal government.(4) The members of the council may receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation under RCW 43.03.250.(5) The council shall meet as often as necessary at the call of the chair or by vote of the council, but not less than quarterly. A majority vote of the members of the council is required for any vote or official action by the council.(6) The council shall direct the administrator to prepare and present for approval a plan of operations related to the operations, management, and administration of the fund on an annual basis. At least annually, the council shall direct the administrator to present the plan of operations to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, reporting on the fund assets, projections for the durability of the fund, the success of the fund, and whether or not the fund is serving its purpose.(7) The department shall provide secretarial and administrative services for the council and shall serve as custodian of the records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) There is established a fund for the purposes of reimbursing eligible claims paid by electrical companies and consumer-owned utilities for damages that resulted from a covered wildfire. Electrical companies must participate in the fund and pay the fund contribution set by the council under section 3(1)(c) of this act. Consumer-owned utilities may elect to participate in the fund. All electric utilities participating in the fund must comply with the requirements of this section to maintain eligibility for disbursements from the fund.(2) To maintain eligibility for the fund, a participating electric utility must:(a) Remit to the administrator of the wildfire fund an annual contribution set by the council. A participating electric utility may collect a surcharge from its customers to cover the cost of the wildfire fund annual contribution in the form of a cost recovery rider, provided that it provides a discounted rate to low-income customers consistent with RCW 80.28.068;(b) Comply with the utility's submitted and approved wildfire mitigation plan. Submission and approval of an electrical company's wildfire mitigation plan shall be consistent with RCW 80.28.445. For consumer-owned utilities, wildfire mitigation plans created consistent with RCW 19.29A.170 must be submitted to the council for approval; and(c) Maintain commercially reasonable wildfire insurance coverage.(3) The council shall annually review and set the:(a) Wildfire surcharge for each participating electric utility. The council may set the surcharge for participating consumer-owned utilities at a lower rate than electrical companies. In setting the surcharge, the council must consider the:(i) Balance of the fund and a fund reserve level sufficient to support:(A) The expected liabilities of the fund over the current and next fiscal biennium; and(B) The administration of the fund;(ii) Market share of each participating electric utility; and(iii) Number of customers and high risk customers of each participating utility;(b) Damages threshold for fund eligibility for each participating electric utility, based on the number of high risk customers the utility serves and the miles of transmission lines the utility owns and operates. The damages threshold shall be the amount of damages from a covered wildfire for which each participating electric utility is responsible before it can seek reimbursement from the fund. Once the damages for a covered wildfire surpass this amount, the participating electric utility can seek reimbursement from the administrator for excess liabilities that surpass the threshold.(4) To be eligible for payment under this section, a claim must:(a) Be made by an electric utility meeting the eligibility requirements of this section;(b) Be for third-party damages against the electric utility;(c) Result from a covered wildfire that occurred after July 1, 2021; and(d) Exceed the electric utility's damages threshold.(5) The payment of a claim under this section is conditional on the availability of specific funding for this purpose, and nothing in this section shall be construed to create an entitlement to reimbursement or payment of any claim. The total amount paid for claims may not exceed the amounts available in the account established in subsection (6) of this section.(6)(a) The wildfire prevention and protection account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the administrator from participating electric utilities must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for payments of claims to electric utilities pursuant to and for the administration of the fund, including expenses incurred under sections 3, 5, and 13 of this act. Only the administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is required for administrative expenses, but not for payments of claims.(b) Investment earnings received by the wildfire prevention and protection account shall be transferred to the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account in RCW 76.04.511 at least annually.(c) On the last business day of June of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the wildfire prevention and protection account to the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account in RCW 76.04.511 a sum equal to the investment earnings received by the wildfire prevention and protection account posted during the current fiscal year.(7) The council may adopt rules to implement this section. Any rules adopted under this section must be made publicly available on the website of the department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) The administrator shall carry out the duties of the council in administering the fund and may, subject to the approval of the council:(a) Retain, employ, or contract with officers, experts, employees, accountants, actuaries, financial professionals, and other executives, advisers, consultants, attorneys, and professionals as may be necessary in the administrator's judgment for the efficient operation and administration of the fund;(b) Receive and deposit in the fund any remitted fund contributions and wildfire fund annual contributions;(c) Enter into contracts and other obligations relating to the operation, management, and administration of the fund;(d) Review and approve claims and provide funds to the participating electric utilities for the purposes of paying eligible claims, in accordance with section 4 of this act;(e) Buy insurance or take other actions to maximize the claims paying resources of the fund;(f) Pay costs, expenses, and other obligations of the fund;(g) Take any actions necessary to collect any amounts owing to the fund from participating electric utilities;(h) Require repayment of any funds disbursed to an electric utility for claims related to a covered wildfire for which the utility acted with gross negligence, willfulness, or intentionality as determined in a finding by a court of law after aÂ finalÂ disposition of the case has been reached;(i) Undertake such other activities as are related to the operation, management, and administration of the fund, as approved by the council.(2) The salary of the administrator shall be set by the council in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. The administrator is a state employee for purposes of chapter 42.52 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. (1) The state shall have no liability for payment of claims in excess of funds available and any of the funds of the state shall have no obligations whatsoever for payment of claims or costs arising from this chapter.(2) The council is not liable for the implementation of a wildfire mitigation plan by an electric utility. There is no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature may arise against, the state, council, council members, council staff, or council representatives, agents, or consultants for the death of or injury to persons, or property damage, for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties exercised under this chapter.Sec. 7. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, 2025 c 359 s 12, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the wildfire prevention and protection account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 8. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the wildfire prevention and protection account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 9. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the wildfire prevention and protection account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 10. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the wildfire prevention and protection account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 11. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the wildfire prevention and protection account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 12. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the wildfire prevention and protection account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 13. RCW 76.04.185 and 2023 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department, in consultation with the energy resilience and emergency management office of the department of commerce, shall contract with an independent consultant with experience in developing electric utility wildfire mitigation plans to develop an electric utility wildfire mitigation plan format and a list of elements to be included in electric utility wildfire mitigation plans. When developing the plan format and list of elements, the department shall seek input from the utilities and transportation commission, the utility wildland fire prevention advisory committee, electric utilities, the state fire marshal, the governor's office of Indian affairs, and the public. By April 1, 2024, the department shall make public a recommended format and list of elements for electric utility wildfire mitigation plans. The department may update these guidelines annually if needed, but not more than once in each year.(2) The recommended elements must acknowledge that utilities serve areas that vary in topography, vegetation, population, and other characteristics, and that best practices guidelines within each element must recognize that a utility's wildfire mitigation measures will be designed to fit site-specific circumstances. The recommended elements must include, but are not limited to:(a) Vegetation management along transmission and distribution lines and near associated equipment;(b) Infrastructure inspection and maintenance repair activities, schedules, and recordkeeping;(c) Modifications or upgrades to facilities and construction of new facilities to incorporate cost-effective measures to minimize fire risk;(d) Preventative programs, including adoption of new technologies to harden utility infrastructure;(e) Operational procedures;(f) Identification of appropriate widths for vegetation management and rights-of-way, including the consideration of fire-resistant vegetation alternatives; ((and))(g) Public and interested parties' engagement and communication plans addressing wildfire safety and risk mitigation; and(h) After January 1, 2027, recommendations included in the report submitted by the work group established in section 1, chapter 324, Laws of 2025.(3) The recommended format and list of elements identified by the department must be forwarded to the utilities and transportation commission, the energy resilience and emergency management office of the department of commerce, and all electric utilities in Washington state for a review period of no less than three months prior to finalizing the format and list of elements that utilities will use to adopt or update their electric utility wildfire mitigation plan.(4) The department will provide technical assistance to all electric utilities to support inclusion of these guidelines in the revision of their plans.(5) By December 31, 2024, the department must submit to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives a compilation and summary of existing wildfire mitigation plans maintained by electric utilities.(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal electric utility formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, or a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state.(b) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned utility or an investor-owned utility as defined in this section.(c) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors that meets the definition of "corporation" as defined in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state.Sec. 14. RCW 80.28.445 and 2025 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each electrical company must file a wildfire mitigation plan with the commission as soon as practicable after July 27, 2025, unless the company has previously filed a wildfire mitigation plan with the commission prior to July 27, 2025. An electrical company that has previously filed a wildfire plan with the commission must file a plan update as soon as practicable after July 27, 2025. To the extent practicable, a company should try to align the timing of filing a plan and plan updates with the filing of a multiyear rate plan under RCW 80.28.425. The company shall update a plan no less frequently than every three years. The company shall provide a copy of its wildfire mitigation plan and updates to the department of natural resources and the utility wildland fire prevention advisory committee created in RCW 76.04.780 in the format prescribed under RCW 76.04.185 to be posted on the committee's website. After January 1, 2027, all wildfire mitigation plans filed with the commission shall consider the recommendations included in the report submitted by the work group established in section 1, chapter 324, Laws of 2025.(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits an electrical company from updating its wildfire mitigation plan more often than required under subsection (1)(a) of this section.(2) The commission, after holding at least one public workshop and a hearing, must by order approve, reject, or approve with conditions, an electrical company's wildfire mitigation plan within 120 days or plan update within 90 days of the filing of such plan or plan update. The commission may, in its order, recommend or require additional elements or practices to be included in the company's plan. The commission may, in approving with conditions the plan or plan update, make modifications to the plan or plan update that the commission reasonably finds represent a reasonable balancing of mitigation costs with the resulting reduction of wildfire risk. The commission shall issue an order explaining any modifications at the time the plan or plan update is approved. In evaluating a plan or plan update, the commission may consult with and consider information from federal, tribal, state, or local governmental entities, utilities, industry organizations, and groups representing utility customers. The commission shall describe the nature of its consultations with third parties in its order approving or approving with conditions a plan or plan update.(3) The commission must adopt rules to implement this section. The rules must:(a) Provide that a workshop be held pursuant to subsection (2) of this section that will involve local fire protection districts, utilities, affected landowners, and groups representing utility customers; and(b) Include, but need not be limited to, procedures and standards regarding vegetation management, including guidelines for determining fair market landowner compensation when appropriate, public safety power shutoffs and service restoration, pole materials, circuitry, and monitoring systems.(4) The commission is not liable for an electrical company's implementation of its wildfire mitigation plan. There is no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature may arise against, the state, commission, commissioners, commission staff, or commission representatives, agents, or consultants for the death of or injury to persons, or property damage, for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties exercised under this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 76 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. (1) Section 7 of this act expires the earlier of July 1, 2028, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Section 8 of this act expires July 1, 2028.(3) Section 9 of this act expires the earlier of January 1, 2029, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(4) Section 10 of this act expires January 1, 2029.(5) Section 11 of this act expires when RCW 74.76.040 expires.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. (1) Section 8 of this act takes effect when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Sections 9 and 10 of this act take effect July 1, 2028.(3) Sections 11 and 12 of this act take effect January 1, 2029.--- END ---